Utah statutes.
35A-8-804.   Technical assistance to political subdivisions for housing plan.

(1)  Within appropriations from the Legislature, the division shall establish a program to assist municipalities to meet the requirements of Section 10-9a-408 and counties to meet the requirements of Section 17-27a-408.

(2)  Assistance under this section may include:

(a)  financial assistance for the cost of developing a plan for low and moderate income housing;

(b)  information on how to meet present and prospective needs for low and moderate income housing; and

(c)  technical advice and consultation on how to facilitate the creation of low and moderate income housing.

(3)  The division shall submit an annual written report to the Economic Development and Workforce Services Interim Committee before November 1 regarding the scope, amount, and type of assistance provided to municipalities and counties under this section, including the number of low and moderate income housing units constructed or rehabilitated within the state.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 246, 2012 General Session

